New Mexico, session 2026, SB154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of Chapter 59A, Article 18 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] PROPERTY INSURANCE--LOSS FROM WILDFIRE--COVERAGE.--When a policy covers damage from a wildfire as a covered loss, the policy shall include damage from related flooding and flood damage, including damage from landslides, debris flows, mudflows, mudslides or other similar events, as covered losses for five years after the wildfire is controlled." SECTION 2. APPLICABILITY.--The provisions of this act apply to policies issued on or after July 1, 2026. - 2 -